nouns.twol
Alphabet 
	а б в г д е и й л р с у х ч щ ъ ь т н I А Б В Г Д Е И Й Л Р С У Х Ч Щ Ъ Ь Т Н ᵸ Ӏ
	%{е%}:е %{е%}:0
	%{р%}:р %{р%}:н
	%{б%}:б %{б%}:м
	%{и%}:и %{и%}:0
	%{а%}:а %{а%}:0
;

Sets
C = ч щ в д к р л с г х Ӏ б т л н т Ӏ ;
V = а е и у о А Е И У О ъ Ъ %{и%} %{е%} ;

Rules

"{и} V realisation #2"
%{и%}:0 <=> _ V ;

"{а} V realisation #2"
%{а%}:0 <=> _ V ;
